Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Chapter 3 General Regulatory Provisions

Cross references. —

For hunting and fishing licenses generally, see §§

23-2-101

to

23-2-307

.

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2001, House Joint Resolution No. 1, §§ 1 through 3, requests that Congress not reintroduce threatened or endangered species into the state of Wyoming without the consent and approval of the state and without providing the necessary funding.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, §§ 1 to 4, requests Congress to direct all federal authorities responsible for wolf reintroduction in the state to manage wolves so that the elk, moose and deer population, moose and deer habitats and elk feeding grounds are preserved and to annually reimburse the state for the loss of elk, moose and deer to wolves.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d Fish and Game §§ 48-61, 68-70, 72-77.

Validity of prohibition or regulation of fishing to protect public water supply, 56 ALR2d 790.

Applicability, to domesticated or captive game, of closed season game laws, 74 ALR2d 974.

Entrapment with respect to violation of fish and game laws, 75 ALR2d 709.

Right to kill game in defense of person or property, 93 ALR2d 1366.

Validity and construction of statute prohibiting sale within state of specified wild animals or their skins or bodies, 44 ALR3d 1008.

Validity, construction, and application of state wildlife possession laws, 50 ALR5th 703.

36A C.J.S. Fish §§ 28 to 36; 38 C.J.S. Game § 1 et seq.